Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB353.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 38 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1307. K9 Veterans Day.(a) Legislative findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The official K9 Corps was created on March 13, 1942, when the United States military began actively recruiting and training canine forces.(2) Military working dogs are always on the clock and actively working in combat zones worldwide.(3) It is important to recognize the thousands of dogs that served with honor, dignity and valor throughout history, around the clock and in combat zones, just like human 123456789101112131415161718 soldiers.(4) Each military working dog is a noncommissioned officer one rank higher than its handler and is part of the team, risk, intelligence and protection of the United States military.(5) A military working dog risks its health and life by working side by side with human military personnel to accomplish difficult missions.(6) Field medics are now trained on how to treat injured military working dogs.(b) Designation.--March 13 of each year is designated as K9 Veterans Day.(c) Proclamation.--The Governor shall annually issue a proclamation encouraging residents of this Commonwealth to observe K9 Veterans Day.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0353PN0291 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516